Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5203YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2260 Section 1. Section 474.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. As used in this chapter and chapters 475A , 476 , 476A , 3 477A, 477B, 477C , 478 , 479 , 479A , and 479B , âcommissionâ and 4 âutilities commissionâ mean the Iowa utilities commission. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 477B.1 Video streaming services ââ 6 audio volume level of commercials. 7 1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context 8 otherwise requires: 9 a. âCommercial advertisementâ means any paid message 10 or promotional content for a product, service, or brand 11 transmitted during a video streaming service in connection with 12 video programming or video content. 13 b. âConsumer-generated mediaâ means content, including 14 video, audio, and multimedia, created and made available by 15 consumers to internet sites or services on the internet. 16 c. âVideo programmingâ means programming by, or generally 17 considered comparable to programming provided by, a television 18 broadcast station. âVideo programmingâ does not include 19 consumer-generated media. 20 d. (1) âVideo streaming serviceâ means an entity that makes 21 available directly to the consumer, through a distribution 22 method that uses internet protocol, any of the following: 23 (a) Video programming. 24 (b) Video content. 25 (2) âVideo streaming serviceâ does not include a television 26 broadcast station, cable operator, or other multichannel video 27 programming distributor, or an entity that provides video 28 programming or video content without commercial advertisements. 29 2. Advertisement volume level. On and after July 1, 2026, 30 a video streaming service that serves a consumer residing in 31 this state shall not transmit to the consumer a commercial 32 advertisement at a higher average audio volume level than the 33 average audio volume level of the video programming or video 34 content the advertisement accompanies. 35 -1- LSB 5203YH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2260 3. Federal compliance. Subsection 2 shall be enforced 1 consistent with federal communications commission regulations 2 under the federal Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation 3 Act, Pub. L. No. 111-311. 4 4. Enforcement ââ penalties. 5 a. If the commission has reasonable belief that a video 6 streaming service is in violation of subsection 2, the 7 commission shall have the sole authority to bring a civil 8 action to provide for all of the following: 9 (1) Enjoin further violations by the video streaming 10 service. 11 (2) Enforce compliance with this chapter. 12 (3) Seek civil penalties in an amount of not more than 13 five hundred dollars for each violation of this section. For 14 purposes of this subsection, each day a violation of subsection 15 2 occurs shall be a separate violation. 16 b. If the commission notifies a video streaming service of 17 complaints in violation of this section, the video streaming 18 service may demonstrate compliance by doing any of the 19 following: 20 (1) Providing evidence of actual compliance with this 21 section. 22 (2) Providing evidence of ongoing compliance with the 23 most recently published recommended practices provided by the 24 advanced television systems committee. 25 5. Private right of action. This section shall not be 26 construed to create a private right of action. 27